Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 121A.04, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 4a. new text end new text begin Female sports teams. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, only students of the female sex may participate in an elementary or secondary school level athletic team or sport that an educational institution has restricted on the basis of sex to women or girls. If there is a dispute as to whether a student is of the female sex, the student must present a signed physician's statement indicating the student's sex that is based solely on: new text end new text begin (1) the student's internal and external reproductive anatomy; new text end new text begin (2) the student's naturally occurring level of testosterone; and new text end new text begin (3) an analysis of the student's chromosomes. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end